Massachusetts, session 194th, H2629.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1: Chapter 233, Section 20N(a) of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the definition “Emergency Service Provider” and inserting in place
thereof the following definition:- “Emergency service provider”, an active or retired law
enforcement officer, police officer, state police trooper, sheriff or deputy sheriff, firefighter, state
or municipal police criminalist, crime scene personnel, police dispatcher or 911 operator, or
emergency medical personnel.
of 1